California, session 20252026, AB2008.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33318.6 is added to the Education Code, to read:33318.6. (a) On or before October 1, 2027, the department shall create and post to its internet website a standardized template for use by local educational agencies when completing programmatic or expenditure reports for competitive state grant programs, except for grants for technical assistance providers.(b) (1) In drafting the template pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall ensure that the template creates reporting efficiencies for local educational agencies and schools that receive state grants. The department shall consult relevant stakeholders involved in local educational agency reporting, including, but not limited to, local educational agency administrators, governing board or body members, and school business officials from small-, medium-, and large-sized local educational agencies, and the department shall ensure stakeholders represent the demographic and geographic diversity of the state.(2) The consultation shall include solicitation of initial input about the creation of the standardized grant reporting template and opportunities for input on drafts of the template before it is finalized.(c) The template drafted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include the minimum information necessary to ascertain all of the following:(1) Administrative information, which shall include, but not be limited to, the local educational agency and their contact information, the grant number, and reporting period.(2) Programmatic outcomes, which shall include, but not be limited to, the initial goals of the program, implementation status, key performance indicators, key successes, key challenges, and how the program funding has served unduplicated pupils, as applicable.(3) Expenditure outcomes, which shall include, but not be limited to, the initial award amount, the amount spent in the reporting period, and itemized expenditures, including their approved budget, actual expenditures, and variance.(4) The anticipated future of the funded activity. This may include, as applicable, whether the services provided by the grant will be maintained after the funding period ends, including any equipment or assets purchased with the funds.(5) Additional information if required by statute.(d) The department shall identify which information is already reported to the department by local educational agencies in order to avoid reporting duplication. The department shall ensure that grant reporting requirements do not exceed statutory or regulatory requirements.(e) (1) On or before October 1, 2027, the department shall submit the template and a report to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that (A) details the stakeholder engagement that occurred when designing the template, (B) provides recommendations for how the template is to be used going forward, and (C) provides any additional information.(2) The requirement for submitting the report under this subdivision shall be inoperative on October 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.(f) Commencing January 1, 2028, the department shall issue the final programmatic or expenditure report template to local educational agencies as part of the notice of award information, and again six months before the final report due date. The department shall prepopulate the relevant administrative information described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).(g) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.SEC. 2. Section 10231.6 is added to the Government Code, to read:10231.6. (a) Beginning January 1, 2028, a bill that, as introduced or amended in either house of the Legislature, would require a local educational agency to complete a new programmatic or expenditure report for competitive state grant programs, except for grants for technical assistance providers, shall include a provision that requires the final programmatic or expenditure report to be submitted using the template described in Section 33318.6 of the Education Code.(b) Beginning January 1, 2028, the Legislative Counsel, in drafting a bill for introduction or an amendment to a bill that would impose a programmatic or expenditure reporting requirement on a local educational agency described in subdivision (a), shall include a provision that requires the final programmatic or expenditure report to be submitted using the template described in Section 33318.6 of the Education Code, unless the person requesting the bill or amendment directs the Legislative Counsel to do otherwise.(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.SEC. 3. Section 10231.7 is added to the Government Code, to read:10231.7. (a) (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, a bill that, as introduced or amended in either house of the Legislature, would require a local educational agency to complete a plan or report with an undefined end date shall include a provision that repeals the planning or reporting requirement, or makes the requirement inoperative, no later than a date four years following the date upon which the bill, as enacted, bill becomes operative if the planning or reporting requirement has an undefined end date, or four years after the final due date of any plan or report required every four or more years. report.(2) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.(b) Beginning January 1, 2027, the Legislative Counsel, in drafting a bill for introduction or an amendment to a bill that would impose a planning or reporting requirement described in subdivision (a), shall include a provision that repeals the requirement, or makes the planning or reporting requirement inoperative, four years after the date on which the requirement becomes operative, consistent with the requirements of subdivision (a), unless the person requesting the bill or amendment directs the Legislative Counsel to do otherwise.